California statutes. Public Utilities Code
The chairman shall preside at all meetings of the board. He shall perform such other functions as delegated to him under this part or under any regulation prescribed by the board. The chairman may move or second any motion, and shall vote upon all orders, resolutions, or ordinances passed upon by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1161.)
-------------------------------------------

101122.

In the absence of the chairman at any meeting, the vice chairman shall preside. In the event of the inability of the chairman to perform the functions of his office, such functions shall be performed by the vice chairman with the same force and effect as the performance of such functions by the chairman.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1161.)
-------------------------------------------

101123.

A majority of the members of the board shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business. The adoption of any minute order, resolution, or ordinance shall require the affirmative votes of at least three members of the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1161.)
-------------------------------------------

101124.

The acts of the board shall be expressed by minute order, resolution, or ordinance. District ordinances shall be adopted by the board in substantially the same manner as prescribed for the adoption of county ordinances by the board of supervisors.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1161.)
-------------------------------------------

101125.

By resolution or ordinance, the board shall prescribe the time and place of the regular meetings of the board. All meetings of the board shall be held in compliance with the terms of the Ralph M. Brown Act (Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 54950), Part 1, Division 2, Title 5 of the Government Code).

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1161.)
-------------------------------------------

101126.

In any particular not otherwise provided for by this part, the board, by resolution or ordinance, may prescribe any regulation which it may deem appropriate for the proper conduct of the internal functions of the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1161.)
-------------------------------------------

101127.

Except as otherwise provided in Section 101304, whenever the signature of any officer or employee of the district is authorized or required under the provisions of this part, the signature may be made by the use of a plate or stamp bearing a facsimile of the signature, or such signature may be reproduced by any other facsimile method authorized by law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1161.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Compensation and Expenses [101130. - 101131.]

101130.

Each member of the board shall receive a per diem compensation for his services for each day, or portion thereof, in which he is in attendance at meetings of the board. The amount of the compensation shall be fixed by the board, but shall not exceed fifty dollars ($50) for each day’s attendance. In no event shall the total compensation received by any member of the board in any one calendar month exceed the sum of one hundred dollars ($100).

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1161.)
-------------------------------------------

101131.

In addition to the compensation provided for in Section 101130, each member of the board shall receive reimbursement for his actual and necessary traveling expenses incurred in the discharge of his official duties when such travel is beyond the territory of the district and when such travel is first approved by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1161.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Vacancies [101135. - 101136.]

101135.

Any vacancy in the membership of the board shall be filled for the unexpired term of the member whose office has become vacant, and shall be made by appointment by the body which is authorized, pursuant to Section 101103, to make the appointment of the particular class of director whose office has become vacant.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1161.)
-------------------------------------------

101136.

The appointment to fill a vacancy shall be made within 30 days after the creation of the vacancy. In the event the vacancy is in the class of member provided for in subdivision (c) of Section 101103, and if the remaining members of the board fail to fill the vacancy within that time, then, within 30 days thereafter, the vacancy shall be filled by the majority vote of a conference committee composed of five members selected as follows: two members of the board of supervisors chosen by that board, two members of the City Council of the City of Bakersfield chosen by the city council, and one member chosen by the majority vote of the four members so
 selected.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1161.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Removal From Office [101140. - 101141.]

101140.

Any member of the board may be removed at any time and without cause by the body which is authorized, pursuant to Section 101103, to make the appointment of the particular class of director who is removed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1161.)
-------------------------------------------

101141.

Any such removal from office shall create a vacancy to be filled in the manner prescribed by Sections 101135 and 101136.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1161.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Powers and Duties of Directors [101150. - 101154.]

101150.

All matters and things necessary for the proper administration of the affairs of the district which are not provided for by this part shall be provided for by the board. The powers vested in the board by this part shall be deemed to be inclusive but not exclusive.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1161.)
-------------------------------------------

101151.

The board shall supervise and regulate every transit facility owned and operated or controlled by the district, including the fixing of rates, rentals, charges and classifications, and the making and enforcement of regulations, contracts, practices, and schedules for, or in connection with, any transit facility owned or controlled by the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1161.)
-------------------------------------------

101152.

The board may either itself operate the transit system, or any part thereof, or it may contract with any other public or private agency or corporation to operate all, or any part, of the transit system for the district, or it may contract with any other public or private agency or corporation for the improvement in transit services, facilities, equipment, or operations being operated and conducted by such agency or corporation, and all of the same either within the district, outside the district, or both.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1161.)
-------------------------------------------

101153.

The board may contract with the governing body of any school district, and the governing board of any school district may contract with the board, for the transportation by any transit facility of the transit district of any pupils in attendance at any school maintained and operated by any such school district lying either in whole or in part within the transit district created under this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1161.)
-------------------------------------------

101154.

The board may, from time to time, contract for or employ any professional service required by the district and may, from time to time, contract for or employ any other person necessary to perform any other work or service which cannot be satisfactorily performed by the regular employees of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1161.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Other Officers [101160. - 101173.]

101160.

Prior to the time the district has operated, controlled, or used transit facilities, or any part thereof, for the transportation of passengers under the provisions of this part for a period of six months, the board may, but is not required to, appoint a general manager. A general manager appointed during such time shall hold office at the pleasure of the majority of the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1161.)
-------------------------------------------

101161.

After the district has operated, controlled, or used transit facilities, or any part thereof, for the transportation of passengers under the provisions of this part for a period of six months, the board shall forthwith appoint a general manager.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1161.)
-------------------------------------------

101162.

All other things being equal, the board shall appoint as general manager a person who has had experience in the acquisition, construction, or management of transit facilities.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1161.)
-------------------------------------------

101163.

Except as otherwise provided in this part, and subject to the policies established by the board, the general manager shall have the responsibility and the authority for the proper administration of the affairs of the district and the maintenance and operation of the transit facilities of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1161.)
-------------------------------------------

101164.

The general manager may be removed from office by resolution. Before the general manager may be removed, he shall, if he so demands, be given a written statement of the grounds for his removal, and he shall have the right to be publicly heard thereon at a meeting of the board prior to the final vote on the resolution providing for his removal. Pending and during such hearing, the board may suspend him from office, and without payment of salary, for a period of not to exceed 30 days. The board may not reduce the salary of the general manager below the amount currently being received by him, except upon the adoption of a resolution after a like opportunity to be publicly
 heard. The action of the board in suspending or removing the general manager, or reducing his salary, is final.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1161.)
-------------------------------------------

101165.

The board shall appoint a secretary and an attorney to serve as legal counsel to the district. These officers shall serve at the pleasure of the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1161.)
-------------------------------------------

101166.

If the moneys of the district, or any part thereof, are deposited in a depositary other than the county treasury, the board shall appoint a treasurer who shall be responsible for the safekeeping and disbursing of all district moneys and funds held by him. The treasurer shall serve at the pleasure of the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1161.)
-------------------------------------------

101167.

No member of the board of directors, and no county or city officer or employee of the county or a city located within the county, shall be eligible for appointment to any of the offices provided for in this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1161.)
-------------------------------------------

101168.

Within 10 days after his appointment and before entering upon the discharge of his official duties, each of the officers appointed under the provisions of this article shall take and file his oath of office pursuant to Sections 1360 and 1363 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1161.)
-------------------------------------------

101169.

The board may consolidate any of the district offices provided for by this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1161.)
-------------------------------------------

101170.

The treasurer of the district, if one is appointed by the board, shall give bond for the faithful performance of his or her duties. The board may require any other officer to give a similar bond. The amount of each bond shall be fixed by the board. All bonds shall be approved by the board and shall be recorded in the office of the county recorder and filed in the office of the clerk of the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 221, Sec. 116.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

101171.

The secretary shall maintain and preserve a permanent written record of all of the official acts of the board as evidenced by minute order, resolution, or ordinance.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1161.)
-------------------------------------------

101172.

The board shall fix the compensation of the officers provided for in this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1161.)
-------------------------------------------

101173.

The premium upon any bond required under this article is a charge against the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1161.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. General Powers and Functions of the District [101175. - 101208.5.]



  ARTICLE 1. Corporate Power [101175. - 101179.]

101175.

The district has perpetual succession and may adopt a seal and alter it at pleasure.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1161.)
-------------------------------------------

101176.

Except as otherwise provided by law, the district may sue and be sued in all courts and tribunals of competent jurisdiction.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1161.)
-------------------------------------------

101177.

The district may exercise the right of eminent domain to take any property necessary or convenient to the exercise of the powers granted in this part. In the exercise of such power, in addition to the damage for the taking, injury, or destruction of property, the district shall also pay the cost of removal, reconstruction, or relocation of any railways, mains, pipes, conduits, cables, poles, or other structures or facilities of any public utility or public agency which is required to be moved to a new location.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1176.)
-------------------------------------------

101178.

No action in eminent domain to acquire property, or any interest therein, shall be commenced unless the legislative body of the city, as to property which is located within such city, or the board of supervisors, as to property which is located within the unincorporated territory, has consented by resolution to such acquisition.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1161.)
-------------------------------------------

101179.

No such taking or acquisition by the district which would involve the abandonment, removal, relocation, or use of the property of a railroad corporation, as defined in Section 230, shall be permitted, unless the Public Utilities Commission, after hearing, shall find and determine that the public interest and necessity require the abandonment, removal, relocation, or use of such property and that such taking or acquisition will not unreasonably impair the ability of the railroad corporation involved to provide safe, adequate, economical, and efficient service.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1161.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Contracts [101180. - 101181.]

101180.

The district may make contracts and enter into stipulations of any nature whatsoever, either in connection with eminent domain proceedings or otherwise, including, without limiting the generality of the foregoing, contracts and stipulations to indemnify and save harmless, to engage labor or services, and to do all acts necessary and convenient for the full exercise of the powers granted in this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1161.)
-------------------------------------------

101181.

No officer or employee of the district shall in any manner be interested, directly or indirectly, in any contract awarded or to be awarded by the board, or in the profits to be derived therefrom, contrary to the provisions of Article 4 (commencing with Section 1090), Chapter 1, Division 4, Title 1 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1161.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Property [101190. - 101191.]

101190.

The district may take by grant, purchase, gift, devise, or lease, or condemn in proceedings under eminent domain, or otherwise acquire, and hold and enjoy, real and personal property of every kind within or outside the district and necessary to the full or convenient exercise of its powers. The board may lease, mortgage, or otherwise encumber, or sell, or otherwise convey or dispose of, any real or personal property within or outside the district when, in its judgment, it is for the best interests of the district to do so.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1161.)
-------------------------------------------

101191.

Whenever the board by resolution determines that any record, map, book, or paper which has been in the possession of the district, or any officer or employee thereof, for more than five years is of no further value to the district, the board may authorize its sale, destruction, or other disposition. This section shall not apply to the permanent records of the secretary as provided for in Section 101171, unless such written records are first transferred to microfilm or other miniature or electronic reproduction for permanent preservation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1161.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Transit Facilities and Service [101195. - 101206.]

101195.

The district may acquire, construct, own, operate, control, or use rights-of-way, rail lines, buslines, stations, platforms, switches, yards, terminals, and any and all other facilities necessary or convenient for transit service within or partly outside the district, underground, upon, or above the ground and under, upon, or over public streets or other public ways or waterways, together with all physical structures necessary or convenient for the access of persons and vehicles thereto, and may acquire any interest in, or rights to, the joint use of any or all of the foregoing; provided, that installations in any street, road, or other property devoted to a public use
 shall be subject to consent of the governing body in charge of such public use.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1161.)
-------------------------------------------

101196.

The district may, without limitation by any other provisions of this part requiring approval of indebtedness, accept contributions of money, rights-of-way, labor, materials, and any other property for the acquisition, construction, maintenance, and operation of transit facilities, and may, without limitation by any other provisions of this part, enter into any contracts and cooperation with, and accept cooperation from the United States, the state, or any department, instrumentality, or agency thereof, or any public agency in the acquisition, construction, maintenance, and operation of, and in financing the acquisition, construction, maintenance, and operation of, any
 such transit facilities.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1161.)
-------------------------------------------

101197.

The district shall not interfere with, or exercise control over, any transit facilities now or hereafter owned and operated wholly or partly within the district by any city or public agency, unless by consent of such city or public agency and upon such terms as are mutually agreed upon between the board and such city or public agency.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1161.)
-------------------------------------------

101198.

The district may lease, or contract for the use of, its transit facilities, or any portion thereof, to any operator, and may provide for subleases by such operator upon such terms and conditions as it deems in the public interest. The word “operator” as used in this section means any city or public agency or any person, firm, or private corporation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1161.)
-------------------------------------------

101199.

The district may construct and operate or acquire and operate works and facilities in, under, upon, over, across, or along any street or public highway or any stream, bay, or watercourse, or over any of the lands which are the property of the state, to the same extent that such rights and privileges appertaining thereto are granted to municipalities within the state, and to install adequate bus stops, including the painting of curbs, subject to the governing body in charge of such streets, highways, stream, watercourse, or lands.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1161.)
-------------------------------------------

101200.

The district may enter into agreements for the joint use of any property and rights by the district and any city, public agency, or public utility operating transit facilities and may enter into agreements with any city, public agency, or public utility operating any transit facilities, either wholly or partially within or outside the district, for the joint use of any property of the district or of such city, public agency, or public utility, or the establishment of through routes, joint fares, transfer of passengers, or pooling arrangements.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1161.)
-------------------------------------------

101201.

The rates and charges for service furnished by the district shall be fixed by the board and shall be reasonable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1161.)
-------------------------------------------

101202.

The board of supervisors, or the city council of a municipality having territory located within the district, may file a request for a hearing before the district board as to the reasonableness of any rates or charges fixed by the district and as to any proposal for fixing the location of facilities by the district. The request shall be in writing, and shall state the subject matter on which a hearing is desired.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1161.)
-------------------------------------------

101203.

Upon the filing of a request for hearing as provided for in Section 101202, the district board shall fix the time and place for hearing. The time fixed shall be not less than 20 days nor more than 60 days from the date such request is filed. Notice of such hearing shall be given by mail to the city or county requesting such hearing and to each local agency lying either in whole or in part within the district. Such mailing shall be completed not later than the 15th day before the date fixed for the hearing. Notice of the hearing shall be published by the district pursuant to Section 6066 of the Government Code. The first publication shall be made not sooner than the 30th
 day and not later than the 15th day before the date fixed for the hearing.

As used in this section, “local agency” means the county, an incorporated city, and a special district, including a school district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1161.)
-------------------------------------------

101204.

Prior to, or at the time fixed, for hearing, the board of supervisors, or any city council eligible to file a request for hearing, and not a party to the original request for hearing, may intervene by filing a written notice of intervention with the secretary of the district. Any such intervener shall be entitled to be heard and introduce evidence.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1161.)
-------------------------------------------

101205.

Within 30 days after submission of the case, the board shall render its decision and its decision shall be final.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1161.)
-------------------------------------------

101206.

The district may operate charter bus service subject to the following limitations:

(a) No bus equipment which is designed solely for charter service shall be purchased. A bus equipped with a toilet or underfloor baggage compartment shall be deemed charter equipment.

(b) The board shall hold a public hearing prior to adopting a charter rate schedule or any amendment thereof. Notice of the hearing shall be mailed to each charter-party carrier operating within the district at least 30 days prior to the hearing. The notice shall include the
 proposed charter rate schedule. At the close of the public hearing, the board may adopt charter rate schedules which shall not be less than the average for the three largest private charter-party carriers operating similar service in the district.

(c) Charter service shall originate and terminate within the area served by the district, unless a private charter-party carrier requests the district to provide service beyond the area served by the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1161.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Existing Systems [101208.1. - 101208.5.]

101208.1.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this part, before the district may establish any transit service or system which may at any time divert, lessen, or compete for the patronage or revenues of any existing system, the district shall give a written notice to the public utility which is operating the existing system. The written notice shall describe the transit service or system which the district proposes to establish and shall state the time within which the district proposes to establish such service or system.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1161.)
-------------------------------------------

101208.2.

The district shall not establish the proposed service or system, or maintain and operate the service or system, until it has completed the purchase of the existing system or any part thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1161.)
-------------------------------------------

101208.3.

The purchase price to be paid for the existing system, or any portion thereof to be purchased, shall be the reproduction cost new, including going concern value, at the date upon which the district commences negotiations for the purchase of the existing system, or the portion of the existing system, less depreciation, including wear, tear, and obsolescence, if any.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1161.)
-------------------------------------------

101208.4.

The district and public utility operating the existing system may agree upon the purchase price or they may agree that the purchase price is to be established by arbitration and upon the method of naming arbitrators and the method of conducting such arbitration.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1161.)
-------------------------------------------

101208.5.

Section 851 shall not apply to any contract for sale or sale of an existing system, or any portion thereof, pursuant to this article, and the Public Utilities Commission shall have no jurisdiction with respect thereto.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1161.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6. General Financial Provisions [101210. - 101260.]



  ARTICLE 1. Deposit and Withdrawal of Funds [101210. - 101216.]

101210.

To facilitate the business of the district, the board may provide for the creation and administration of such funds as the needs of the district may require and may transfer moneys and credits from one fund to another as the public interest requires. The board may provide for the deposit of the moneys of the district in any depository authorized by law to receive the deposit of public funds. The moneys so deposited shall be disbursed in accordance with regulations established by the board, and all payments from any fund shall be reported to the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1161.)
-------------------------------------------

101211.

Whenever the moneys of the district, or any part thereof, are deposited in a depositary other than the county treasury, all withdrawals of funds shall be made by check or warrant of the district signed by the treasurer of the district. All such withdrawals in payment of demands against the district shall be paid in accordance with such regulations as the board shall establish.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1161.)
-------------------------------------------

101212.

The board may designate the county treasury as the depositary, and in such case the county treasurer shall have custody of all, or any portion, of the moneys of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1161.)
-------------------------------------------

101213.

If the county treasury is designated as the depositary, the county treasurer shall:

(a) Receive and receipt for all of the district’s moneys received by him and place it in the county treasury to the credit of the district.

(b) Be responsible upon his official bond for the safekeeping and disbursing of all district moneys and funds so held by him.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1161.)
-------------------------------------------

101214.

When the county treasury has been designated as the depositary, the county treasurer shall have the custody of the district’s moneys and funds, and he shall pay out the same, or any portion thereof, only upon the warrant of the county auditor. The county auditor shall draw his warrants to pay demands against the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1161.)
-------------------------------------------

101215.

The board shall examine, settle, and allow all accounts legally chargeable against the district, and shall order checks or warrants to be drawn in payment thereof by the treasurer of the district, or by the warrant of the county auditor upon the county treasury, as the case may be.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1161.)
-------------------------------------------

101216.

The board may provide by resolution, under such terms and conditions as it sees fit, for the payment of demands against the district without the prior specific approval thereof by the board, if the demand is for the purpose for which an expenditure has been previously approved by the board and is in an amount no greater than the amount so authorized and the demand is approved by the general manager.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1161.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Indebtedness [101220. - 101223.]

101220.

The district may borrow money for the purpose of defraying the expenses of the district lawfully incurred after the commencement of the fiscal year, but prior to the time moneys from the tax levy for the fiscal year are received by the district, in a sum which shall not exceed fifteen cents ($0.15) on each one hundred dollars ($100) of assessed valuation of taxable property in the district at the time the moneys are borrowed, and may evidence such borrowing by notes bearing interest at a rate not to exceed 7 percent per annum. The notes shall be payable from the tax levy from the then current fiscal year, which levy shall contain a sum sufficient to provide for the
 payment of the notes and the interest thereon. The form of the notes, and the proceedings relating to their issuance and sale, shall be governed by the applicable provisions contained in Article 7 (commencing with Section 53820), Chapter 4, Part 1, Division 2, Title 5 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1161.)
-------------------------------------------

101221.

The board may, within a period of two years from and after the formation of the district, pursuant to a resolution adopted by it for the purpose, borrow money on certificates of indebtedness, promissory notes, or other evidences of indebtedness, in anticipation of the estimated tax revenue for the following fiscal year, to be repaid within four years from the date of borrowing with interest at a rate not to exceed 7 percent per annum, in order to enable the district to meet all of its necessary initial expenses of organization, construction, acquisition, maintenance, and operation. The total amount of money borrowed and indebtedness incurred under this section during
 this two-year period shall not exceed 50 percent of the total amount of estimated tax revenue as estimated by the county auditor for the following fiscal year.

The form of the notes, and the proceedings relating to their issuance and sale, shall be governed by the applicable provisions contained in Article 7 (commencing with Section 53820), Chapter 4, Part 1, Division 2, Title 5 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1161.)
-------------------------------------------

101222.

The district may accept, without limitation by any other provisions of this part requiring approval of indebtedness, contributions or loans from the United States, this state, or any department, instrumentality, or agency of either thereof, for the purpose of financing the acquisition, construction, maintenance, and operation of transit facilities, and may enter into contracts and cooperate with, and accept cooperation from, the United States, this state, or any department, instrumentality, or agency of either thereof, in the acquisition, construction, maintenance, and operation, and in financing the acquisition, construction, maintenance, and operation of any such
 transit facilities in accordance with any legislation which Congress or the Legislature of the State of California may have theretofore adopted or may hereafter adopt, under which aid, assistance, and cooperation may be furnished by the United States or this state in the acquisition, construction, maintenance, and operation, or in financing the acquisition, construction, maintenance, and operation, of any such transit facilities. The district may do any and all things necessary in order to avail itself of such aid, assistance, and cooperation under any federal or state legislation now or hereafter enacted. Any evidence of indebtedness issued under this section shall constitute a negotiable instrument.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1161.)
-------------------------------------------

101223.

The authority to incur indebtedness vested in the district by the provisions of this article shall be in addition to any right vested in it to receive a temporary transfer of funds pursuant to the last paragraph of Section 6 of Article XVI of the California Constitution.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 140, Sec. 165.   (AB 1164)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Investments [101230. - 101234.]

101230.

The district may invest any surplus money in its treasury, including money in any sinking fund, in any of the following:

(a) Its own bonds.

(b) Treasury notes, certificates of indebtedness, bills, bonds of the United States, or any other evidence of indebtedness secured by the full faith and credit of the United States.

(c) Obligations issued pursuant to the Federal Home Loan Bank Act or the National Housing Act.

(d) Treasury notes or bonds of this state, or of any public corporation, municipal corporation, public district, or political subdivision within this state which are legal as security for the deposit of public funds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1161.)
-------------------------------------------

101231.

Such investment may be made by direct purchase of any issue of such bonds, treasury notes, or obligations, or part thereof, at the original sale or by the subsequent purchase of the bonds, treasury notes, or obligations.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1161.)
-------------------------------------------

101232.

Any bonds, treasury notes, or obligations purchased and held as investments by the district may, from time to time, be sold and the proceeds reinvested in bonds, treasury notes, or obligations as provided in this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1161.)
-------------------------------------------

101233.

Sales of any bonds, treasury notes, or obligations purchased and held by the district shall, from time to time, be made in season so that the proceeds may be applied to the purposes for which the money with which the bonds, treasury notes, or obligations were originally purchased was placed in the treasury of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1161.)
-------------------------------------------

101234.

With the consent of the board, the general manager may:

(a) Authorize the trust department of any state or national bank in this state, or a trust company authorized to act as such in this state, to receive as his agent deposits of any securities acquired by the district.

(b) Place and maintain for safekeeping as a trust deposit with the trust department of any state or national banks in this state, or a trust company authorized to act as such in this state, any securities owned by the district.

The
 bank or trust company selected shall have a total paid-in capital of at least one million dollars ($1,000,000). The general manager shall take from the trust department or trust company a receipt for the securities, and neither the general manager nor the district is responsible for the custody and safe return of the securities until they are withdrawn from the trust department or trust company by the general manager. Any trust department or trust company to which securities are delivered, either as agent or depository for the district, shall make such disposition of the securities as the general manager directs and is responsible only for the strict compliance with written instructions given to it by the general manager. All such securities are at all times subject to the order of the general manager.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1161.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Audits and Financial Report [101240. - 101245.]

101240.

The general manager shall cause to be installed and maintained a system of auditing and accounting which shall completely and at all times show the financial condition of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1161.)
-------------------------------------------

101241.

The fiscal affairs of the district shall be predicated upon a fiscal year commencing on the first day of July of each calendar year and terminating on the 30th day of June of the following calendar year.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1161.)
-------------------------------------------

101242.

Within 90 days from and after the close of each fiscal year, the general manager shall prepare and file with the secretary of the district a financial report showing the result of the operations of the district for the preceding fiscal year and the financial status of the district on the last day thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1161.)
-------------------------------------------

101243.

A copy of the financial report shall be kept in the office of the general manager and shall be available to public inspection at all times during the regular office hours of his office.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1161.)
-------------------------------------------

101244.

Within 15 days after the filing of the financial report, the general manager shall publish a notice of such filing and shall state the fact of such availability for public inspection, together with the address of the office of the general manager. Such publication shall be in accord with Section 6061 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1161.)
-------------------------------------------

101245.

Within 15 days after the filing of the financial report, the general manager shall transmit a copy thereof to the board of supervisors and to the city council of each city within the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1161.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Budget [101250. - 101256.]

101250.
